Rhode Island, session 2025, SB165.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-29.1-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-29.1 entitled "Pharmacy
Freedom of Choice — Fair Competition and Practices" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-29.1-7. Regulation of pharmacy benefits managers.
(a) Pharmacy benefits managers shall be included within the definition of third-party
administrator under chapter 20.7 of this title and shall be regulated as such. The annual report filed
by third-party administrators with the department of business regulation shall include: contractual
language that provides a complete description of the financial arrangements between the third-party
administrator and each of the insurers covering benefit contracts delivered in Rhode Island; and if
the third-party administrator is owned by or affiliated with another entity or entities, it shall include
an organization chart and brief description that shows the relationships among all affiliates within
a holding company or otherwise affiliated. The reporting shall be in a format required by the
director and filed with the department as a public record as defined and regulated under chapter 2
of title 38.
(b) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not participate in "spread pricing " which, for the
purposes of this chapter, means the charging or claiming by a pharmacy benefit manager any
amount in excess of the amount paid to the pharmacy, less an administrative fee, on behalf of a
health benefit plan and a covered person for a prescription drug covered under the plan.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001208/SUB A
========
LC001208/SUB A - Page 2 of 3